Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 2. Power of Governor to Grant Pardons, Commutations, and Reprieves.

Sec. 33.20.070.
Governor may grant pardons, commutations, and reprieves.

The governor may grant pardons, commutations of sentence, and reprieves, and suspend and remit fines and forfeitures in whole or part for offenses against the laws of the State of Alaska or the Territory of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 1961)

Cross references. —

For the constitutional provision on this subject, see Alaska Const., art. III, § 21.

Sec. 33.20.080.
Required notices and investigation by the board of parole.

The governor may not grant executive clemency to a person unless the governor has first provided notice of consideration of executive clemency to the board of parole for investigation and at least 120 days have elapsed since the notice required under (b) of this section has been provided. The board shall investigate each case and, not later than 120 days after receipt of the notice of consideration, submit to the governor a report of the investigation, together with all other information the board has regarding the person. When the report is submitted, the board shall also transmit to the governor the comments it has received under (b) of this section.

The board shall send notice of the governor’s consideration of executive clemency to the Department of Law, the office of victims’ rights, and the victim of a crime against a person, a crime involving domestic violence, or arson in the first degree within five business days after receipt of notice of consideration from the governor. The victim may comment in writing to the board on the consideration for executive clemency. The board shall provide notice of any action taken by the governor to the Department of Law, the office of victims’ rights, and the victim.

If the victim’s address is unknown, the board shall make reasonable efforts to locate the victim to provide the notice required under this section. The board shall ensure that the victim’s address is kept confidential.

In this section,

“crime against a person” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

;

“crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 16 SLA 1961; am §§ 18, 19 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 56, 57 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 1 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (d)(2) was enacted as (d)(3). Renumbered in 1996, at which time former (d)(2) was renumbered as (d)(3).